Massachusetts, session 194th, S1410.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Opiate” the following 
definition:-  
“Opioid antagonist”, a drug, including but not limited to naloxone, approved by the 
federal Food and Drug Administration for the complete or partial reversal of an opioid or opiate 
overdose.  

of 5 7  SECTION 2. Section 34A of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following 2 subsections:-  
f) State and municipal law enforcement personnel and emergency medical personnel 
including, but not limited to, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, and fire department 
personnel may provide and transfer an opioid antagonist to an individual or to an individual’s 
family member, friend, or other person with knowledge of an individual’s prior substance use, 
along with instructions on administration and use of the opioid antagonist, to provide opioid 
overdose protection to an individual. The provision and transfer of an opioid antagonist shall be 
based upon the good faith judgement of the law enforcement or emergency medical personnel 
including but not limited to their experience, training, knowledge, observations and the 
information provided by an  individual at substantial risk of experiencing an opioid-related 
overdose event or from an individual’s family, friend or others with knowledge of an 
individual’s prior opioid use; provided, however, that such provision or transfer of opioid 
antagonists shall be subject such drug’s availability; provided further, that a governmental entity 
or organization that employs such law enforcement and emergency medical personnel may 
promulgate or implement reasonable rules or regulations concerning such provision or transfer.  
(g) A person acting in good faith may provide, administer or utilize testing equipment to 
assist another person in identifying or analyzing the strength, effectiveness or purity of a 
controlled substance. A person who, in good faith, provides, administers or utilizes testing 
equipment to assist another person in identifying or in analyzing the strength, effectiveness or 
purity of a controlled substance shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a controlled 
substance under section 34 or possession of drug paraphernalia under section 32I. Testing 

of 5 29 equipment shall include, but not be limited to, fentanyl test strips, colorimetric reagents, high-
performance liquid chromatography, gas chromatography and mass spectrometry.  
SECTION 3. Section 201 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph:-  
First aid training required under this section shall include instruction on how to 
administer opioid antagonists, in overdose emergencies. The training for the administration of 
opioid antagonists shall meet the standards prescribed by the department. Required personnel 
shall satisfactorily complete an initial instruction as soon as practical, but in no event more than 
1 year after the start date of their employment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, required 
personnel who began their employment before the effective date of the training requirement 
prescribed under this paragraph shall satisfactorily complete their instruction as soon as practical, 
but in no event more than 1 year after said effective date. Satisfactory completion of a refresher 
course in administering opioid antagonists as approved by the department shall be required every 
3 years, unless the department establishes an earlier time requirement by regulation.  
SECTION 4. Said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting 
after section 201, the following section:-  
Section 201½. (a) As used in this section, the following words, unless the context clearly 
requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-  
“Emergency first response vehicle”, any official government motor vehicle and 
motorized watercraft that is intended and primarily operated to provide for the transport and 
rapid response of first responders to emergencies involving the public.  

of 5 50  “First responders”, members of police and fire departments, members of the state police 
participating in highway patrol, and members of emergency reserve units of a volunteer fire 
department or fire protection district, who are trained to administer an opioid antagonist pursuant 
to the first aid training requirements under section 201; provided, however, that first responders 
shall not include police officers, fire department personnel and persons engaged in police and 
fire work whose duties are primarily clerical or administrative.  
“Opioid antagonist”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C.  
(b) A governmental entity or organization shall be responsible to provide on duty first 
responders with an opioid antagonist for use in opioid overdose emergencies. This requirement 
shall be complied with by implementing 1, or any part or combination, of the following methods: 
(i) equipping emergency first response vehicles under its ownership, care or control with an 
opioid antagonist; or (ii) supplying an opioid antagonist to its first responders to be carried by 
such persons when on duty; provided, however, that replacement doses are made available no 
less than 48 hours following the administration of the last remaining dose of opioid antagonist 
provided by the government entity or organization to the first responder or made available in the 
emergency first response vehicle.  
(c) The requirement of a government entity or organization to provide its first responders 
with an opioid antagonist under this section, shall be subject to such drug’s availability, provided 
the government entity or organization has taken reasonable measures, as soon as practicable, to 
acquire and replenish its supply of an obtainable opioid antagonist to comply with this 
requirement.  

of 5 71  (d) No cost shall be assessed to first responders by their employing or appointing 
governmental entity or organization for any opioid antagonist required under this section to be 
supplied or made available to first responders, including any device necessary for first 
responders to carry the drug when on duty, which shall be provided by such entity or 
organization.  
(e) The immunity provisions established under subsection (g) of section 19B and 34A of 
chapter 94C shall also apply to first responders who administer an opioid antagonist.  
SECTION 5. Subsections (b) through (d), inclusive, of Section 4 shall take effect 8 
months after the passage of this act.